Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-40] Court records. The court
shall keep a record of all child protective proceedings under this chapter. Written
reports, photographs, x-rays, or other information that are submitted to the
court may be made available to other appropriate persons, who are not parties,
only upon an order of the court. The court may issue this order upon
determining that such access is in the best interests of the child or serves
some other legitimate purpose.

As set forth in rules adopted pursuant to
chapter 91 by the department of human services and consistent with applicable
laws, the department may disclose information in the court record without order
of the court, unless otherwise ordered by the court. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next